Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8715
Patient safety organization; board of directors; membership.

The board of directors of a patient safety organization shall include at least one representative each from a statewide association of Nebraska hospitals, Nebraska physicians and surgeons, Nebraska nurses, Nebraska pharmacists, and Nebraska physician assistants as recommended by such associations. At least one consumer shall be a member of the board. The board shall consist of at least twelve but no more than fifteen members as established at the discretion of the board.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 15.